Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1407
Bylaws.

Each association incorporated hereunder shall make such provision as it may desire for the adoption of its board of directors of a code of bylaws for the government and management of its business consistent herewith.

Laws 1925, c. 80, § 7, p. 251;

C.S.1929, § 24-1407;

R.S.1943, § 21-1407.